Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 41.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1501
Act, how cited.

Sections 49-1501 to 49-1562 shall be known and
may be cited as the Nebraska Short Form Act.

Laws 1988, LB 475, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB712, § 41.